Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1242
Appropriations; use.

Any funds which have been appropriated by or to any agency for the acquisition of real property or any interest in real property for a particular program or project shall also be available for expenditure to carry out the Relocation Assistance Act as applied to such program or project.

Laws 1989, LB 254, § 29.